Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201358-849
Money received by authority; deemed trust funds; investment.

All money received by the authority, whether as proceeds
from the sale of bonds, from revenue, or otherwise, shall be deemed to be
trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance
Authority Act but, prior to the time when needed for use, may be invested in direct and general obligations of or
obligations fully and unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America,
obligations issued by agencies of the United States of America, any obligations
of the United States of America or agencies thereof, obligations of this state,
or any obligations or securities which may from time to time be legally purchased
by governmental subdivisions of this state pursuant to subsection (1) of section
77-2341, except that any funds pledged to secure a bond issue shall be invested
in the manner permitted by the resolution or trust indenture securing such
bonds. Such funds shall be deposited as soon as practical in a separate account
or accounts in banks or trust companies organized under the laws of this state
or in national banking associations. The money in such accounts shall be paid
out on checks signed by the executive director or other officers or employees
of the authority as the authority authorizes. All deposits of money shall,
if required by the authority, be secured in such a manner as the authority
determines to be prudent, and all banks or trust companies may give security
for the deposits, except to the extent provided otherwise in the
resolution authorizing the issuance of the related bonds or in the trust indenture securing such bonds. The resolution
authorizing the issuance of such bonds or the trust indenture securing
such bonds shall provide that any officer to whom or any bank or trust company
to which such money is entrusted shall act as trustee of such money and shall
hold and apply the same for the purposes of the Nebraska
Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance Authority Act, subject
to the act, and of the authorizing resolution or trust indenture.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 46;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 25;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2946;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 46;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1746;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 49.
September 6, 2013